extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX B Y 223
SFX B   0           a          [aeiouy]rod is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^aeiouy]rod is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^r]od is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          otok is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          stol is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          to[klnv] is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^t]o[klnv] is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          el is:genitive
SFX B   ol          ola        ol is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^eoo]l is:genitive
SFX B   0           e          yv is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^aiioy].[^o][knv] is:genitive
SFX B   cek         cka        [aiioy]cek is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [ouy]r is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          ner is:genitive
SFX B   us          u          mus is:genitive
SFX B   os          u          mos is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^m]us is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^au]s is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          at is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [aeiouy]vet is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          [^aeiouy]vet is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^cv]et is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          sit is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          ust is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          kut is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^e]t is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          ivot is:genitive
SFX B   0           a          o[hlm]ov is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^dgklrstv] is:genitive
SFX B   og          gu         zog is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [^z]og is:genitive
SFX B   0           u          [aeiouy]rod is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^aeiouy]rod is:dative
SFX B   0           e          [^aeiouy]rod is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^r]od is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^o]d is:dative
SFX B   0           u          to[klnv] is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^t]o[klnv] is:dative
SFX B   0           u          el is:dative
SFX B   ol          olu        ol is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^aiioy].[^o][knv] is:dative
SFX B   cek         cku        [aiioy]cek is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [aeiouy]r is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^u]s is:dative
SFX B   0           u          [^aeiouy]vet is:dative
SFX B   0           u          o[hlm]ov is:dative
SFX B   og          gu         zog is:dative
SFX B   0           0          . is:accusative
SFX B   0           e          [aeiouy]rod is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^r]od is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^o]d is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^t]o[klnv] is:locative
SFX B   0           i          el is:locative
SFX B   ol          ole        ol is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^aeoo]l is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^n][aeiouy]r is:locative
SFX B   0           i          ner is:locative
SFX B   us          e          mus is:locative
SFX B   os          e          mos is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^m]us is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^u]s is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [aeiouy]vet is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^aeiouy]vet is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^cv]et is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^e]t is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [aa]v is:locative
SFX B   0           e          o[hlm]ov is:locative
SFX B   0           e          [^dghklrstv] is:locative
SFX B   0           mi         [aeiouy]rod is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^r]od is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^o]d is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv] is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv] is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         el is:instrumental
SFX B   ol          olom       ol is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^eoo]l is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^aiioy].[^o][knv] is:instrumental
SFX B   cek         ckom       [aiioy]cek is:instrumental
SFX B   us          om         mus is:instrumental
SFX B   os          om         mos is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^m]us is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^dgklrstv] is:instrumental
SFX B   0           om         [^z]og is:instrumental
SFX B   0           y          [aeiouy]rod is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^aeiouy]rod is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^r]od is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^o]d is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          to[klnv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^t]o[klnv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           i          ial  is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           e          [^i]al is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          el is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   ol          oly        ol is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^eoo]l is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   cek         cky        [aiioy]cek is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^aiioy].[^o][knv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [aeiouy]r is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   us          y          mus is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   os          y          mos is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^m]us is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^u]s is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [aeiouy]vet is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^aeiouy]vet is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^cv]et is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^e]t is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          o[hlm]ov is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^dgklrstv] is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           ia         tan is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   og          gy         zog is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           y          [^z]og is:nominative is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [aeiouy]rod is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^aeiouy]rod is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^r]od is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^o]d is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         to[klnv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^t]o[klnv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         el is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   ol          olov       ol is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^eoo]l is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   cek         ckov       [aiioy]cek is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^aiioy].[^o][knv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [aeiouy]r is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   us          ov         mus is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   os          ov         mos is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^m]us is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^u]s is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [aeiouy]vet is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^aeiouy]vet is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^cv]et is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^e]t is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         o[hlm]ov is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^dgklrstv] is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   og          gov        zog is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           ov         [^z]og is:genitive is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [aeiouy]rod is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^aeiouy]rod is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^r]od is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^o]d is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         to[klnv] is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^t]o[klnv] is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         el is:dative is:plural
SFX B   0           om         [^eoo]l is:dative is:plural
