extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Bospor/B po:noun is:masculine
Gemer/B po:noun is:masculine
Izrael/B po:noun is:masculine
LibreOffice/B po:noun is:masculine
Oman/B po:noun is:masculine
Saturn/B po:noun is:masculine
Vatikan/B po:noun is:masculine
abonman/B po:noun is:masculine
afekt/B po:noun is:masculine
akuzativ/B po:noun is:masculine
amfibol/B po:noun is:masculine
anion/B po:noun is:masculine
apendix/B po:noun is:masculine
arzenicnan/B po:noun is:masculine
austroslavizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
azbestocement/B po:noun is:masculine
bananik/B po:noun is:masculine
batoh/B po:noun is:masculine
betatron/B po:noun is:masculine
biotyp/B po:noun is:masculine
bocik/B po:noun is:masculine
botulizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
brovning/B po:noun is:masculine
buxus/B po:noun is:masculine
cechoslovakizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
chalatik/B po:noun is:masculine
chlorit/B po:noun is:masculine
chrbatik/B po:noun is:masculine
cikcak/B po:noun is:masculine
cmud/B po:noun is:masculine
cyklotron/B po:noun is:masculine
decibel/B po:noun is:masculine
des/B po:noun is:masculine
dialektizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
disent/B po:noun is:masculine
doklad/B po:noun is:masculine
dovoz/B po:noun is:masculine
druh/BC po:noun is:masculine
dvojalbum/B po:noun is:masculine
dysgramatizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
eidetizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
empirizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
eskalator/B po:noun is:masculine
evergreen/B po:noun is:masculine
faktor/B po:noun is:masculine
ferment/B po:noun is:masculine
flak/B po:noun is:masculine
formant/B po:noun is:masculine
frkot/B po:noun is:masculine
galenit/B po:noun is:masculine
germanizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
grafit/B po:noun is:masculine
hak/B po:noun is:masculine
heraklit/B po:noun is:masculine
hlbkomer/B po:noun is:masculine
homebanking/B po:noun is:masculine
hribik/B po:noun is:masculine
hurt/B po:noun is:masculine
idiom/B po:noun is:masculine
indikator/B po:noun is:masculine
interval/B po:noun is:masculine
jackpot/B po:noun is:masculine
jen/B po:noun is:masculine
kadlub/B po:noun is:masculine
kamrlik/B po:noun is:masculine
karamel/B po:noun is:masculine
kartun/B po:noun is:masculine
kentaurus/B po:noun is:masculine
kmit/B po:noun is:masculine
kompenzator/B po:noun is:masculine
kontrast/B po:noun is:masculine
kozustek/B po:noun is:masculine
krypton/B po:noun is:masculine
labyrint/B po:noun is:masculine
letacik/B po:noun is:masculine
luminizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
malicek/B po:noun is:masculine
medicinbal/B po:noun is:masculine
mikrobus/B po:noun is:masculine
monofyzitizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
musketa/B po:noun is:masculine
naplav/B po:noun is:masculine
neoplasticizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
nozicek/B po:noun is:masculine
obustek/B po:noun is:masculine
ohnivak/B po:noun is:masculine
ostep/B po:noun is:masculine
pank/B po:noun is:masculine
pasik/B po:noun is:masculine
penzion/B po:noun is:masculine
plan/B po:noun is:masculine
pochod/B po:noun is:masculine
poklak/B po:noun is:masculine
pop-art/B po:noun is:masculine
potocnik/B po:noun is:masculine
predstih/B po:noun is:masculine
priebeh/B po:noun is:masculine
priraz/B po:noun is:masculine
proviant/B po:noun is:masculine
radian/B po:noun is:masculine
regres/B po:noun is:masculine
rododendron/B po:noun is:masculine
rozvrh/B po:noun is:masculine
samizdat/B po:noun is:masculine
seizmograf/B po:noun is:masculine
sializmus/B po:noun is:masculine
sklonomer/B po:noun is:masculine
smer/B po:noun is:masculine
spagat/B po:noun is:masculine
stadion/B po:noun is:masculine
ston/B po:noun is:masculine
substrat/B po:noun is:masculine
svik/B po:noun is:masculine
tantacizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
termit/B po:noun is:masculine
tovarich/B po:noun is:masculine
tribadizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
tvorcek/B po:noun is:masculine
upis/B po:noun is:masculine
valov/B po:noun is:masculine
viadukt/B po:noun is:masculine
vorkoholizmus/B po:noun is:masculine
vykaz/B po:noun is:masculine
vyvod/B po:noun is:masculine
zaduch/B po:noun is:masculine
zavan/B po:noun is:masculine
zltacik/B po:noun is:masculine
zvyk/BN po:noun is:masculine
